Missouri, session 2026, HB1719.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 590.040, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 590.040, to read as follows:
590.040. 1. The POST commission shall set the minimum number of hours of basic
training for licensure as a peace officer no lower than six hundred, with the following
exceptions:
(1) Up to one thousand hours may be mandated for any class of license required for
commission by a state law enforcement agency;
(2) As few as one hundred twenty hours may be mandated for any class of license
restricted to commission as a reserve peace officer with police powers limited to the
commissioning political subdivision;
(3) Persons validly licensed on August 28, 2001, may retain licensure without
additional basic training;
(4) Persons licensed and commissioned within a county of the third classification
before July 1, 2002, may retain licensure with one hundred twenty hours of basic training if
the commissioning political subdivision has adopted an order or ordinance to that effect;
(5) Persons serving as a reserve officer on August 27, 2001, within a county of the
first classification or a county with a charter form of government and with more than one
million inhabitants on August 27, 2001, having previously completed a minimum of one
hundred sixty hours of training, shall be granted a license necessary to function as a reserve
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1719 2
peace officer only within such county. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "reserve
officer" shall mean any person who serves in a less than full-time law enforcement capacity,
with or without pay and who, without certification, has no power of arrest and who, without
certification, must be under the direct and immediate accompaniment of a certified peace
officer of the same agency at all times while on duty; and
(6) The POST commission shall provide for the recognition of basic training received
at law enforcement training centers of other states, the military, the federal government and
territories of the United States regardless of the number of hours included in such training and
shall have authority to require supplemental training as a condition of eligibility for licensure.
2. The director shall have the authority to limit any exception provided in subsection
1 of this section to persons remaining in the same commission or transferring to a commission
in a similar jurisdiction.
3. The basic training of every peace officer, except agents of the conservation
commission, shall include at least thirty hours of training in the investigation and
management of cases involving domestic and family violence. Such training shall include
instruction, specific to domestic and family violence cases, regarding: report writing;
physical abuse, sexual abuse, child fatalities and child neglect; interviewing children and
alleged perpetrators; the nature, extent and causes of domestic and family violence; the safety
of victims, other family and household members and investigating officers; legal rights and
remedies available to victims, including rights to compensation and the enforcement of civil
and criminal remedies; services available to victims and their children; the effects of cultural,
racial and gender bias in law enforcement; and state statutes. Said curriculum shall be
developed and presented in consultation with the department of health and senior services, the
children's division, public and private providers of programs for victims of domestic and
family violence, persons who have demonstrated expertise in training and education
concerning domestic and family violence, and the Missouri coalition against domestic
violence.
4. The basic training of every peace officer first licensed on or after August 28, 2027,
shall include at least six hours of training concerning the prohibition against racial profiling
and such training shall promote understanding and respect for racial and cultural differences
and the use of effective, noncombative methods for carrying out law enforcement duties in a
racially and culturally diverse environment. Such training shall include two hours of racial
profiling training, two hours of implicit bias training, and two hours of de-escalation training.
5. The basic training of every peace officer shall include at least four hours of
training on officer-canine encounters and canine behaviors. Such training shall include
instruction on the following:
(1) Understanding and anticipating canine behavior;

HB 1719 3
(2) Handling canine-related calls and unplanned encounters with canines;
(3) The use of humane methods and tools in handling canine encounters;
(4) State laws relating to canines;
(5) The use of force continuum principles in relation to canines; and
(6) The use of nonlethal methods to avoid and defend against potential canine
attacks.
✔